Utah statutes.
70A-1a-103.   Construction of this title to promote its purposes and
policies -- Applicability of supplemental principles of law.
(1)  This title must be liberally construed and applied to promote its
underlying purposes and policies, which are:
(a)  to simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing commercial
transactions;
(b)  to permit the continued expansion of commercial practices through custom,
usage, and agreement of the parties; and
(c)  to make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.
(2)  Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this title, the
principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relative
to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud,
misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, and other validating
or invalidating cause supplement its provisions.
